Oklahoma, session 2026, SB900.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 85.5a, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 85.5a. A. Except for the state fleet card, the state
purchase card program administered by the Purchasing Division is the
only card program authorized for use by state agencies.
B. On a monthly basis the State Purchasing Director and
institutions of higher education shall provide to the Director of
the Office of Management and Enterprise Services (OMES) a complete
listing in electronic format of all transactions paid by a state
purchase card. The list shall contain the name of the purchaser and
purchasing agency, amount of purchase and all available descriptions
of items purchased.
C. Upon receipt of the list described in subsection B of this
section, the Director of the OMES shall allow the public access to

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB900 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

the list in searchable format through its website defined in Section
46 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
D. The State Purchasing Director may authorize the use of a
state purchase card for acquisitions within the following
parameters:
1. No limit on the amount of the transaction for the following:
a. purchases from statewide contracts and from contracts
awarded by the State Purchasing Director for the
benefit of a state agency,
b. utilities,
c. interagency payments,
d. emergency acquisitions; provided, requirements to
establish an emergency pursuant to Section 5 of this
act or other applicable statute or rule have been met,
and
e. professional services as defined in Section 803 of
Title 18 of the Oklahoma Statutes; and
2. For any other transaction with a state purchase card, the
transaction shall not exceed the greater of Five Thousand Dollars
($5,000.00) or the limit determined by the State Purchasing
Director, not to exceed the fair and reasonable acquisition
threshold amount.
E. The State Purchasing Director may authorize personnel of the
Department of Commerce, upon a finding by the Secretary of Commerce
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB900 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

that such personnel have a legitimate need therefore, to utilize a
state purchase card for acquisitions for programs, functions or
services essential to the mission of the agency while traveling on
Department of Commerce business in foreign locations with
transaction limits not to exceed Thirty-five Thousand Dollars
($35,000.00). The purchase cardholders are required to sign a
purchase card agreement prior to becoming a cardholder and to attend
purchase card procedure training. The Department of Commerce will
conduct quarterly internal auditing on all purchase card
transactions associated with business and travel in foreign
locations.
F. Any political subdivision participating in the state
purchase card program may issue a solicitation pursuant to the
provisions Section 85.7 of this title for the acquisition of a
purchase card.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON RETIREMENT AND GOVERNMENT
RESOURCES
March 4, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED






SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB900 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)